Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202546-304
Electric light and power system; construction or acquisition; examination and report by Chief Water Officer.

Upon receipt by the Chief Water Officer of the plans, reports, and statements provided for in section 46-302 or of the petition provided for in section 46-303, the Chief Water Officer shall examine the proposed plan and project, make an estimate of the probable cost thereof, and make such further examination and investigation concerning the same as the Chief Water Officer shall deem necessary or advisable. If the Chief Water Officer deems the proposed plan and project feasible and practicable, either as originally submitted or as changed and amended by the Chief Water Officer, the Chief Water Officer shall then file with the board of directors of the irrigation district concerned its report in the matter, which report shall include a complete explanation of the proposed project, the plans and maps showing location of the project, the estimated cost of the project, and the probable receipts from the sale of electric energy, and the certificate of the Chief Water Officer that the project has been examined and deemed feasible and practicable by the Chief Water Officer.

Laws 1931, c. 91, § 4, p. 254;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 46-704;

R.S.1943, § 46-304;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 162;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 147.